Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-209
Amendments; form of ballots; when transmitted.

The form of the ballots prepared in conformity with sections 49-202.01, 49-207, and 49-208 shall be transmitted to the county clerks and election commissioners of the several counties of this state at least fifty days before the election at which such proposition or amendments are to be voted upon.

Laws 1895, c. 5, § 3, p. 70;

R.S.1913, § 3706;

C.S.1922, § 3094;

C.S.1929, § 49-209;

R.S.1943, § 49-209;

Laws 1961, c. 242, § 1, p. 722;

Laws 1973, LB 554, § 2;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 561;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 109.